Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 5
PUBLIC BENEFIT CORPORATIONS

Law reviews:

For article, "The Long and Winding Road to Public Benefit

C

orporations in

C

olorado", see 43 Colo. Law. 39 (Jan. 2014).

7-101-501. Short title.

This part 5 shall be known and may be cited as the "Public Benefit Corporation Act of Colorado".

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1138), ch. 230, p. 1099, § 1, effective April 1, 2014.

7-101-502. Law applicable to public benefit corporations - how formed.

This part 5 applies to all public benefit corporations. If a corporation elects to become a public benefit corporation under this part 5 in the manner prescribed in this part 5, it is subject in all respects to the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", articles 101 to 117 of this title, and the "Colorado Corporations and Associations Act", article 90 of this title, except to the extent this part 5 imposes additional or different requirements, in which case such additional or different requirements apply.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1138), ch. 230, p. 1099, § 1, effective April 1, 2014.

7-101-503. Public benefit corporation - definitions - contents of articles of incorporation.

A public benefit corporation is a for-profit corporation organized under and subject to the requirements of the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", articles 101 to 117 of this title 7, or a domestic cooperative organized under article 55, 56, or 58 of this title 7 that is subject to the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", that is intended to produce a public benefit or public benefits and to operate in a responsible and sustainable manner. To that end, a public benefit corporation shall be managed in a manner that balances the shareholders' pecuniary interests, the best interest of those materially affected by the corporation's conduct, and the public benefit identified in its articles of incorporation. In its articles of incorporation, a public benefit corporation shall:

Identify within its statement of business or purpose pursuant to section 7-103-101 (1) one or more specific public benefits to be promoted by the public benefit corporation; and

State at the beginning of the articles of incorporation that it is a public benefit corporation.

"Public benefit" means one or more positive effects or reduction of negative effects on one or more categories of persons, entities, communities, or interests other than shareholders in their capacities as shareholders, including effects of an artistic, charitable, cultural, economic, educational, environmental, literary, medical, religious, scientific, or technological nature.

"Public benefit provisions" means the provisions of articles of incorporation contemplated by this part 5.

The domestic entity name of a public benefit corporation may contain the words "public benefit corporation", the abbreviation "P.B.C." or "Pub. Ben. Corp.", or the designation "PBC", which shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of section 7-90-601 (3)(a), and must otherwise satisfy the requirements of section 7-102-102 (1)(a). If the name does not contain the language specified in this subsection (4), the public benefit corporation shall, before issuing unissued shares of stock or disposing of treasury shares, provide notice to any person to whom the stock is issued or who acquires the treasury shares that it is a public benefit corporation; except that the notice need not be provided if the issuance or disposal is pursuant to an offering registered under the federal "Securities Act of 1933", 15 U.S.C. sec. 77a et seq., as amended, or if, at the time of issuance or disposal, the public benefit corporation has a class of securities that is registered under the federal "Securities Exchange Act of 1934", 15 U.S.C. sec. 78b et seq., as amended.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1138), ch. 230, p. 1099, § 1, effective April 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

IP(1), (1)(a), and 4 amended, (HB 17-1200), ch. 386, p. 1999, § 1, effective August 9.

7-101-504. Nonprofit corporations.

A nonprofit corporation cannot be a constituent entity in connection with any merger with or conversion into a public benefit corporation.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1138), ch. 230, p. 1100, § 1, effective April 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

(2), (4)(b), and (4)(c) amended and (4)(d) added, (HB 17-1200), ch. 386, p. 2000, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1925, § 27, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-045), ch. 33, p. 182, § 1, effective August 10.

7-101-505. Share certificates - notices regarding uncertificated shares.

A share certificate issued by a public benefit corporation must note conspicuously that the corporation is a public benefit corporation formed pursuant to this part 5. A statement sent by a public benefit corporation pursuant to section 7-106-207 must state conspicuously that the corporation is a public benefit corporation formed pursuant to this part 5.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1138), ch. 230, p. 1102, § 1, effective April 1, 2014.

7-101-506. Duties of directors.

The board of directors shall manage or direct the business and affairs of a public benefit corporation in a manner that balances the pecuniary interests of the shareholders, the best interests of those materially affected by the corporation's conduct, and the specific public benefit identified in its articles of incorporation.

A director of a public benefit corporation:

Does not, by virtue of the public benefit provisions of section 7-101-503 (1), have a duty to any person on account of an interest of the person in the public benefit identified in the articles of incorporation or on account of an interest materially affected by the corporation's conduct; and

With respect to a decision implicating the balance requirement in subsection (1) of this section, will be deemed to satisfy the director's fiduciary duties to shareholders and the corporation if the director's decision is both informed and disinterested and not such that no person of ordinary, sound judgment would approve.

For the purposes of this section, a director's ownership of or other interest in the stock of a public benefit corporation does not, alone, create a conflict of interest on the part of the director with respect to the director's decision implicating the balancing requirement in subsection (1) of this section, except to the extent that the ownership or interest would create a conflict of interest if the corporation was not a public benefit corporation. In the absence of a conflict of interest, a failure to satisfy the balancing requirement specified in subsection (1) of this section does not, for the purposes of section 7-108-401 or 7-108-403 or article 109 of this title 7, constitute an act or omission that is not in good faith or a breach of the duty of loyalty.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1138), ch. 230, p. 1102, § 1, effective April 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (HB 17-1200), ch. 386, p. 2001, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p.1965, § 66, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (SB 22-045), ch. 33, p. 184, § 2, effective August 10.

7-101-507. Benefit report - definition.

A public benefit corporation shall prepare an annual report that includes:

A narrative description of:

The ways in which the public benefit corporation promoted the public benefit identified in the articles of incorporation and the best interests of those materially affected by the public benefit corporation's conduct;

Any circumstances that have hindered the public benefit corporation's promotion of the identified public benefit and the best interests of those materially affected by the public benefit corporation's conduct; and

The process and rationale for selecting or changing the third-party standard used to complete the assessment pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section; and

An assessment of the overall social and environmental performance of the public benefit corporation against a third-party standard:

Applied consistently with any application of that standard in prior benefit reports; or

Accompanied by an explanation of the reasons for any inconsistent application. The assessment does not need to be performed, audited, or certified by a third party.

For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, "third-party standard" means a standard for defining, reporting, and assessing the overall corporate social and environmental performance, which standard is developed by an organization that is not controlled by the public benefit corporation or any of its affiliates and that makes publicly available the following information:

The criteria considered when measuring the social and environmental performance of a business, the relative weightings of those criteria, if any, and the process for development and revision of the standard; and

Any material owners of the organization that developed the third-party standard, the members of its governing body and how they are selected, and the sources of financial support for the organization, in sufficient detail to disclose any relationships that could reasonably be considered to compromise its independence.

A public benefit corporation that prepares a report pursuant to this section shall send it to each shareholder.

A public benefit corporation shall post all of its reports prepared pursuant to this section on the public portion of its website, if any, but the public benefit corporation may omit from the posted reports any financial or proprietary information included in the reports.

If a public benefit corporation does not have a website, the public benefit corporation shall provide a copy of its most recent report, without charge, to a person that requests a copy, but the public benefit corporation may omit any financial or proprietary information from the copy of the benefit report so provided.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1138), ch. 230, p. 1102, § 1, effective April 1, 2014.

L. 2014:

IP(1) amended, (SB 14-156), ch. 192, p. 713, § 1, effective May 15.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 17-1200), ch. 386, p. 2001, § 4, effective August 9.

7-101-508. Actions to enforce requirements of section 7-101-506 (1).

Any action to enforce the requirements of section 7-101-506 (1), including any individual, derivative, or other type of action, may not be brought unless the parties bringing the action own, individually or collectively, as of the date of instituting the action, either:

At least two percent of the corporation's outstanding shares; or

In the case of a corporation with shares listed on a national securities exchange:

Two percent of the corporation's outstanding shares; or

Shares of the corporation with a market value of at least two million dollars.

This section does not relieve the parties bringing an action described in subsection (1) of this section from complying with other conditions applicable to a derivative action, including any rules of the court in which the action is filed.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1138), ch. 230, p. 1103, § 1, effective April 1, 2014.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-045), ch. 33, p. 184, § 3, effective August 10.

7-101-509. No effect on other corporations.

The existence of a provision of this part 5 does not of itself create an implication that a contrary or different rule of law is or would be applicable to a corporation or other entity that is not a public benefit corporation.

Except as provided in section 7-101-504, this part 5 does not affect a statute or rule of law that applies to a corporation that is not a public benefit corporation.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire part added, (HB 13-1138), ch. 230, p. 1103, § 1, effective April 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1200), ch. 386, p. 2001, § 5, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-045), ch. 33, p. 184, § 4, effective August 10.